District of Columbia statutes.
6-218

Applicability of the Hatch Act.

The provisions of 5 U.S.C. §§ 7321 through 7328 affecting political activities of employees shall apply to employees of the Authority.

History

May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-105, § 19, 47 DCR 1325

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see notes following § 6-201.